District of Columbia statutes.
4-322

Findings.

The Council of the District of Columbia finds that:

(1)

Finding adoptive families for children, for whom state assistance is desirable pursuant § 4-301, and assuring the protection of the interests of children affected during the entire assistance period, require special measures when the adoptive parents move to other states or are residents of another state.

(2)

Provision of medical and other necessary services for children, with state assistance, encounters special difficulties when the provision of services takes place in other states.

June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 402, 47 DCR 2850